Wisconsin, session 2025, SB595.
do enact as follows:SB595,11Section 1. 5.05 (19) of the statutes is created to read:SB595,3,615.05 (19) Voter citizenship audit. The commission shall cooperate with the 2legislative audit bureau to conduct the audit under s. 13.94 (11) to identify 3individuals listed in the official registration list under s. 6.36 who are not U.S. 4citizens. The commission shall also direct each municipal clerk and board of 5election commissioners to cooperate with the legislative audit bureau to conduct the 6audit under s. 13.94 (11).SB595,27Section 2. 5.056 of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,3,2085.056 Matching program with secretary of transportation. The 9commission administrator shall enter into the agreement with the secretary of 10transportation specified under s. 85.61 (1) to match personally identifiable 11information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 126.36 (1) and the information specified in s. 6.34 (2m) with personally identifiable 13information maintained by the department of transportation. The agreement shall 14require the department of transportation to provide the commission access to 15personally identifiable information maintained by the department of 16transportation in order to verify that individuals on the official registration list are 17U.S. citizens. The commission shall immediately verify the information on the list 18whenever an individual registers to vote or modifies his or her registration. The 19administrator and the secretary shall update the agreement at least once every 2 20years.SB595,321Section 3. 5.057 of the statutes is created to read:SB595,4,5225.057 Matching program with the state registrar. The commission 23administrator shall enter into the agreement specified under s. 69.03 (16) with the 24state registrar appointed under s. 69.02 (1) (b) to match personally identifiable 1information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 26.36 (1) and the information specified in s. 6.34 (2m) with personally identifiable 3information and vital statistics maintained by the state registrar. The 4administrator and the registrar shall update the agreement at least once every 2 5years.SB595,46Section 4. 5.058 of the statutes is created to read:SB595,4,1375.058 Matching program with the department of corrections. The 8commission administrator shall enter into the agreement with the secretary of 9corrections specified under s. 301.03 (20m) to match personally identifiable 10information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 116.36 (1) and the information specified in s. 6.34 (2m) with the personally 12identifiable information provided under s. 301.03 (20m). The administrator and 13the secretary shall update the agreement at least once every 2 years.SB595,514Section 5. 5.061 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,5,7155.061 (3) A If a complaint received under this section raises a substantial 16question of material fact, the complainant under sub. (1) or any of the complainants 17in a consolidated complaint under sub. (2) may make a written request for a hearing 18and the matter shall then be treated as a contested case under ch. 227, except that 19the commission shall make a final determination with respect to the merits of the 20complaint and issue a decision within 89 days of the time that the complaint or the 21earliest of any complaints was filed, unless the complainant, or each of any 22complainants whose complaints are consolidated, consents to a specified longer 23period. If a complaint raises a substantial question of material fact, but neither the 24complainant nor any of the complainants in a consolidated complaint request a 1hearing, the commission may conduct a hearing as provided under ch. 227. A 2hearing under this subsection shall be held in open session and the oral proceedings 3of the hearing shall be recorded by stenographic or electronic means, consistent 4with s. 227.44 (8). Hearing records shall be available for public inspection, as 5provided under s. 5.05 (5s) (a). The commission shall make a transcript of the oral 6proceedings available for public inspection and in preparation for judicial review, as 7provided under s. 227.44 (8).SB595,68Section 6. 5.061 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB595,5,1595.061 (5) If the commission receives a complaint under sub. (1) that alleges 10that the commission itself is violating Title III of P.L. 107-252, or that such a 11violation is likely to occur as a result of action or inaction by the commission, and 12the complaint raises a substantial question of material fact, the commission shall 13make a final determination with respect to the merits of the complaint and issue a 14decision. The commission may not dismiss the complaint simply because the 15complaint alleges a violation by the commission.SB595,716Section 7. 5.061 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB595,5,22175.061 (6) A complainant may seek judicial review under ch. 227 of any order 18issued under this section that dismisses the complaint or otherwise does not grant 19the relief requested in the complaint. The commission shall publish the results of 20all complaints dismissed under this section on the website maintained by the 21commission. All final determinations made by the commission under this section 22shall be in writing.SB595,823Section 8. 6.275 (1) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,6,15246.275 (1) (f) The total number of postcards sent by the municipal clerk or 1board of election commissioners under s. 6.56 (3), the total number of such 2postcards returned to the municipal clerk or board of election commissioners 3because the elector did not reside at the address given on the postcard, the total 4number of electors whose status was changed from eligible to ineligible on removed 5from the registration list as a result of the audit under s. 6.56 (3), and the number of 6individuals referred to the district attorney under s. 6.56 (3). The municipal clerk 7or board of election commissioners shall provide the information described under 8this paragraph to the elections commission and the county clerk or county board of 9election commissioners at the earliest practicable time after, but no later than 90 10days after, each primary and election at which a state or national office is filled or a 11statewide referendum is held, including any special election. The municipal clerk or 12board of election commissioners shall update the information described under this 13paragraph on a monthly basis and shall submit, on a monthly basis, any such 14updated information to the elections commission and the county clerk or county 15board of election commissioners.SB595,916Section 9. 6.32 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,7,5176.32 (4) If the form is sufficient to accomplish registration and the 18commission or clerk has no reliable information to indicate that the proposed elector 19is not qualified, the commission or clerk shall enter the elector’s name on the 20registration list and transmit a 1st class letter or postcard to the registrant, 21specifying the elector’s ward or aldermanic district, or both, if any, and polling 22place. The letter or postcard shall be sent within 10 days of receipt of the form. If 23the letter or postcard is returned, or if the commission or clerk is informed of a 1different address than the one specified by the elector, the commission or clerk shall 2change the status of remove the elector on from the list from eligible to ineligible. 3The letter or postcard shall be marked in accordance with postal regulations to 4ensure that it will be returned to the commission or clerk if the elector does not 5reside at the address given on the letter or postcard.SB595,106Section 10. 6.33 (4) of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,7,1276.33 (4) When an individual’s registration is changed from eligible to 8ineligible status individual is removed from the registration list for any reason, the 9municipal clerk or board of election commissioners shall enter notify the 10commission, providing the date of and reason for change on removal from the 11registration list. The commission shall keep a permanent record of the removal, 12including the date of and reason for the removal.SB595,1113Section 11. 6.33 (5) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,7,19146.33 (5) (a) 1. Except as provided in par. (b) and this paragraph, whenever a 15municipal clerk receives a valid registration or valid change of a name or address 16under an existing registration or changes a registration from eligible to ineligible 17status, the municipal clerk or the clerk’s designee shall promptly enter 18electronically on the list maintained by the commission under s. 6.36 (1) the 19information required under that subsection.SB595,1220Section 12. 6.36 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB595,8,3216.36 (1) (d) Upon receipt of official notification by the appropriate election 22administrative authority of another state, territory, or possession that an elector 23whose name appears on the list has registered to vote in that state, territory, or 1possession, the commission or the municipal clerk of the municipality where the 2elector formerly resided shall change the elector’s registration from eligible to 3ineligible status remove the elector’s name from the registration list.SB595,134Section 13. 6.36 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb595 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb595 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB595 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB595 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB595: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting